District of Columbia statutes.
42-1602

Waste prohibited without written license; damages; amercement.

Fermors, during their terms, shall not make waste, sale or exile of house or woods, nor of anything belonging to the tenements, that they have to ferm, without special license had by writing of covenant, making mention that they may do it; which thing if they do, and thereof be convict, they shall yield full damage and shall be punished by amercement grievously.

History

52 Hen. 3, ch. 23, § 2, 1267
Kilty’s Rep. 209
Alex. Br. Stat. 46, 47
Comp. Stat. D.C., 318, § 19

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1202.
1973 Ed., § 45-1302.